Utah statutes.
57-21-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Aggrieved person" includes any person who:
(a)  claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or
(b)  believes that the person will be injured by a discriminatory housing
practice that is about to occur.
(2)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.
(3)  "Complainant" means an aggrieved person, including the director, who has
commenced a complaint with the division.
(4)  "Conciliation" means the attempted resolution of issues raised by a
complaint of discriminatory housing practices by the investigation of the
complaint through informal negotiations involving the complainant, the
respondent, and the division.
(5)  "Conciliation agreement" means a written agreement setting forth the
resolution of the issues in conciliation.
(6)  "Conciliation conference" means the attempted resolution of issues raised
by a complaint or by the investigation of a complaint through informal
negotiations involving the complainant, the respondent, and the division.  The
conciliation conference is not subject to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act.
(7)  "Covered multifamily dwellings" means:
(a)  buildings consisting of four or more dwelling units if the buildings have
one or more elevators; and
(b)  ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four or more dwelling
units.
(8)  "Director" means the director of the division or a designee.
(9) (a)  "Disability" means a physical or mental impairment that substantially
limits one or more of a person's major life activities, including a person
having a record of such an impairment or being regarded as having such an
impairment.
(b)  "Disability" does not include current illegal use of, or addiction to,
any federally controlled substance, as defined in Section 102 of the
Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 802.
(10)  "Discriminate" includes segregate or separate.
(11)  "Discriminatory housing practice" means an act that is unlawful under
this chapter.
(12)  "Division" means the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor
established under the commission.
(13) (a)  "Dwelling" means any building or structure, or a portion of a
building or structure, occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as,
a residence of one or more families.
(b)  "Dwelling" also includes vacant land that is offered for sale or lease
for the construction or location of a dwelling as described in Subsection
(13)(a).
(14) (a)  "Familial status" means one or more individuals who have not
attained the age of 18 years being domiciled with:
(i)  a parent or another person having legal custody of the individual or
individuals; or
(ii)  the designee of the parent or other person having custody, with the
written permission of the parent or other person.
(b)  The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial
status shall apply to any person who:
(i)  is pregnant;
(ii)  is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual who has
not attained the age of 18 years; or
(iii)  is a single individual.
(15)  "National origin" means the place of birth of an individual or of any
lineal ancestors.
(16)  "Person" includes one or more individuals, corporations, limited
liability companies, partnerships, associations, labor organizations, legal
representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts,
unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in cases under the United
States Bankruptcy Code, receivers, and fiduciaries.
(17)  "Presiding officer" has the same meaning as provided in Section
63G-4-103.
(18)  "Real estate broker" or "salesperson" means a principal broker, an
associate broker, or a sales agent as those terms are defined in Section
61-2f-102.
(19)  "Respondent" means a person against whom a complaint of housing
discrimination has been initiated.
(20)  "Sex" means gender and includes pregnancy, childbirth, and disabilities
related to pregnancy or childbirth.
(21)  "Source of income" means the verifiable condition of being a recipient
of federal, state, or local assistance, including medical assistance, or of
being a tenant receiving federal, state, or local subsidies, including rental
assistance or rent supplements.
